Hawaii, session 2026, GM1297.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The Hawaii Revised Statutes is amended by
adding a new chapter to be appropriately designated and to read
as follows:
"CHAPTER
CIVIL REMEDIES FOR UNAUTHORIZED DISCLOSURE OF INTIMATE IMAGES
§ -1 Definitions. As used in this chapter:
"Consent" means affirmative, conscious, and voluntary
authorization by an individual with legal capacity to give
authorization.
"Depicted individual" means an individual whose body is
shown in whole or in part in an intimate image. "Depicted
individual" includes a deceased individual.
"Disclosure" means transfer, publication, or distribution
to another person. "Disclose" has a corresponding meaning.
"Harm" includes physical harm, economic harm, and emotional
distress whether or not accompanied by physical or economic
harm.
2026-3410 HB1682 CDl HMSO

Page 2
H.B. NO.
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
"Identifiable" means recognizable by a person other than
the depicted individual:
(1) From an intimate image itself/ or
(2) From an intimate image and identifying characteristic
displayed in connection with the intimate image.
"Identifying characteristic" means information that may be
used to identify a depicted individual.
"Individual" means a natural person.
"Intimate image" means any digital image, photograph, live
or recorded video, or computer-generated image or video that
depicts an individual in a state of undress; in the nude as
defined in section 712-1210; or engaged in sexual conduct.
"Person" means an individual; estate; business or nonprofit
entity; public corporation; government or governmental
subdivision, agency, or instrumentality; or other legal entity.
"Private" means:
(1) Created or obtained under circumstances in which a
depicted individual had a reasonable expectation of
privacy; or
(2) Made accessible through theft, bribery, extortion,
fraud, false pretenses, voyeurism, or exceeding
2026-3410 HB1682 CDl HMSO


Page 3
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
authorized access to an account, message, file,
device, resource, or property.
"Sexual conduct" has the same meaning as in section
712-1210 .
§ -2 Disclosure of intimate images; civil action. (a)
Except as otherwise provided in section -3, a depicted
individual who is identifiable and who suffers harm from a
person's intentional disclosure or threatened disclosure of a
private intimate image without the depicted individual's consent
has a cause of action against the person if the person knew or
reasonably should have known that the depicted individual had a
reasonable expectation that the intimate image would remain
private.
(b) The following conduct by a depicted individual shall
not establish by itself that the depicted individual consented
to the disclosure of the intimate image that is the subject of
an action under this chapter or that the depicted individual
lacked a reasonable expectation of privacy:
(1) Consent to creation of the image; or
(2) Previous consensual disclosure of the image.
2026-3410 HB1682 CDl HMSO 3

Page 4 1682
H.B. NO.
H.D. 1
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
(c) A depicted individual who does not consent to the
sexual conduct or uncovering of the part of the body depicted in
an intimate image of the individual shall retain a reasonable
expectation of privacy even if the image was created when the
individual was in a public place.
§ -3 Liability; exceptions. (a) A person shall not be
liable under this chapter if the person proves that disclosure
of, or a threat to disclose, an intimate image was;
(1) Made in good faith as part of:
(A) Law enforcement activity;
(B) A legal proceeding; or
(C) Medical education or treatment;
(2) Made in good faith in the reporting or investigation
of:
(A) Unlawful conduct; or
(B) Unsolicited and unwelcome conduct;
(3) Related to a matter of public concern or public
interest; or
(4) Reasonably intended to assist the depicted individual.
(b) Subject to subsection (c), a defendant who is a
parent, legal guardian, or individual with legal custody of a
2026-3410 HB1682 CDl HMSO
■illllllllllllllllM

Page 5
H.B. NO.
hTi
C.D. 1
child shall not be liable under this chapter for a disclosure or
threatened disclosure of an intimate image of the child.
(c) If a defendant asserts an exception to liability under
subsection (b), the exception shall not apply if the plaintiff
proves the disclosure was:
(1) Prohibited by law other than as provided in this
chapter; or
(2) Made for the purpose of sexual arousal, sexual
gratification, humiliation, degradation, or monetary
or commercial gain.
(d) Disclosure of, or a threat to disclose, an intimate
image shall not be a matter of public concern or public interest
solely because the depicted individual is a public figure.
(e) As used in this section:
"Child" means an unemancipated individual who is under
eighteen years of age.
"Parent" means a biological, foster, or adoptive parent, a
parent-in-law, a stepparent, a grandparent, or a grandparent-in­
law .
§ -4 Plaintiff's privacy. In an action under this
chapter:
2026-3410 HB1682 CDl HMSO

Page 6
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(1) The court may exclude or redact other identifying
characteristics of the plaintiff from all pleadings
and documents filed, under applicable state law or
procedural rule;
(2) A plaintiff to whom paragraph (1) applies shall file
with the court and serve on the defendant a
confidential information form that includes the
excluded or redacted plaintiff's name and other
identifying characteristics; and
(3) The court may make further orders as necessary to
protect the identity and privacy of a plaintiff.
§ -5 Disclosure of intimate images; civil remedies. (a)
In an action under this chapter, a prevailing plaintiff may
recover:
(1) The greater of:
(A) Economic and noneconomic damages proximately
caused by the defendant's disclosure or
threatened disclosure, including damages for
emotional distress whether or not accompanied by
other damages; or
2026-3410 HB1682 GDI HMSO

IIIIHIIIBIIIIUIIIMHIIIIIIII

Page 7
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(B) Statutory damages not to exceed $10,000 against
each defendant found liable under this chapter
for all disclosures and threatened disclosures by
the defendant of which the plaintiff knew or
reasonably should have known when filing the
action or which became known during the pendency
of the action; provided that in determining the
amount of statutory damages under this
subparagraph, consideration shall be given to the
age of the parties at the time of the disclosure
or threatened disclosure, the number of
disclosures or threatened disclosures made by the
defendant, the breadth of the distribution of the
intimate image by the defendant, and other
exacerbating or mitigating factors;
(2) An amount equal to any monetary gain made by the
defendant from disclosure of the intimate image;
(3) An amount equal to any actual costs incurred by the
plaintiff in retrieving and requesting removal of
distributed intimate images; and
2026-3410 HB1682 CDl HMSO
■niiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiii

Page 8
H.B. NO.
S D. 2
C.D. 1
(4) Punitive damages as allowed under any state law other
than as provided in this chapter.
(b) In an action under this chapter, the court shall order
a non-prevailing defendant to:
(1) Cease and desist from further disclosing the intimate
image;
(2) Destroy or delete, or return to the prevailing
plaintiff, the original and all copies of the intimate
image in the defendant's possession, custody, or
control; and
(3) Identify all persons to whom the defendant disclosed
the intimate image.
(c) In an action under this chapter, the court may award a
prevailing plaintiff:
(1) Reasonable attorneys' fees and costs; and
(2) Additional relief, including injunctive relief.
(d) This chapter shall not affect a right or remedy
available under any state law other than as provided in this
chapter.
§ -6 Statute of limitations. (a) An action brought by
a depicted individual under section -2 (a) for unauthorized
2026-3410 HB1682 CDl HMSO 8

Page 9
H.B. NO.
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
disclosure, where the depicted individual was an adult on the
date of disclosure, shall not be brought later than eight years
from the date the disclosure was discovered or should have been
discovered with the exercise of reasonable diligence.
(b) An action brought by a depicted individual under
section -2(a) for a threat to disclose, where the depicted
individual was an adult on the date of the threat to disclose,
shall not be brought later than eight years from the date of the
threat to disclose.
(c) Subject to section 657-1.8(a)(2), an action brought by
a depicted individual under section -2(a), where the depicted
individual was a minor on the date of the disclosure or threat
to disclose, shall not be brought later than:
(1) Thirty-two years after the eighteenth birthday of the
depicted individual; or
(2) Five years after the date the depicted individual
discovers or reasonably should have discovered that
psychological injury or illness occurring after the
depicted individual's eighteenth birthday was caused
by the unauthorized disclosure,
whichever occurs later.
2026-3410 HB1682 GDI HMSO

Page 10
H.B. NO. ’
C.D. 1
§ -7 Deceased depicted individuals; rights. (a) For a
depicted individual who is deceased, or upon the death of a
depicted individual, all rights of the depicted individual under
this chapter shall vest in the estate of the deceased depicted
individual.
(b) The rights vested in the estate pursuant to subsection
(a) may be exercised by,the personal representative of the
estate in accordance with chapter 560.
(c) If no personal representative has been appointed, any
person authorized under chapter 560 to petition for appointment
of a personal representative may petition the court for
appointment for the limited purpose of exercising the rights
under this chapter.
§ -8 Construction. (a) This chapter shall be construed
to be consistent with the Communications Decency Act of 1996,
title 47 United States Code section 230.
(b) This chapter shall not be construed to alter the law
on sovereign immunity.
§ -9 Severability. If any provision of this chapter or
the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held
invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or
2026-3410 HB1682 CDl HMSO 10

Page 11
H-B. NO. S
C.D. 1
applications of the chapter that can be given effect without the
invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions
of this chapter are severable."
SECTION 2. This Act does not affect rights and duties that
matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were
begun before its effective date.
SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-3410 HB1682 CDl HMSO


1682
H.B. NO.
±
to
(J
Q
Q
Q
APPROVED this 7th day of July ,2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1682, HD 1,SD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1682, H.D. 1, S.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: May 1,2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
31-26